Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.333

Signature of operator, trustee, or holder of power of attorney required on application documentation.

Applications, consents to service, all affidavits required in connection with applications, and all final permits to market shall be signed by the operator, unless a trustee or power of attorney specifically granted such powers has signed on behalf of the operator. If a power of attorney or trustee signature is used, the filing shall contain a copy of the authorization, power of attorney, or trustee authorization.

[ 1988 c 159 s 6.]